North Dakota statutes. TITLE 51 Sales and Exchanges
CHAPTER 51-07 Miscellaneous Provisions
51-07-14.
Maximum amount of service charge which wholesalers and manufacturers may charge on overdue accounts.

Wholesalers and manufacturers, when selling to retailers or other persons, may charge a service charge of up to one and one-half percent per month on the remaining balance of all overdue accounts, provided the parties have entered into a written agreement prior to the transaction setting forth the amount of service charge, computed on the basis of simple interest per annum. The wholesaler or manufacturer shall inform the purchaser in writing at the time of the purchase of the service charge which will be charged if the account becomes overdue. The service charge allowed in this section is allowed on any such purchase on or after July 1, 1971.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 473, § 1.

51-07-15.
Use of electronic or magnetic scanners in retail foodstores — Item pricing required — Exceptions — Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every retail foodstore which uses electronic or magnetic scanners to read prices shall clearly post the selling price of each item in Arabic numerals, by stamp, tag, label, or other conspicuous marking device. If a product is packaged for sale in quantities of more than one, the total price must be posted. The posting must be by a label securely affixed on each item or by a label posted on the shelf edge immediately below or above the item. Compliance with this section is not required for items not marked in accordance with a uniform products code or any similar marking system designed to be scanned by electronic or magnetic checkout equipment. Any person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 531, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 542, § 1.

51-07-16.
Definitions.

As used in sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22, and unless the context otherwise requires:

“Consumer” means the purchaser or lessee, other than for purposes of resale or lease, of a passenger motor vehicle normally used for personal, family, or household purposes. The term includes any person to whom the passenger motor vehicle is transferred for the same purposes during the duration of an express warranty applicable to that passenger motor vehicle, and any other person entitled by the terms of the warranty to enforce the obligations of the warranty.

“Passenger motor vehicle” means a passenger motor vehicle as defined in section 39-01-01 or a truck with registered gross weight of ten thousand pounds [4536 kilograms] or less which is sold or leased in this state. The term does not include a house car, as defined in section 39-01-01.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 2; 1995, ch. 473, § 1.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction and effect of state motor vehicle warranty legislation, 88 A.L.R.5th 301.

51-07-17.
Duty of manufacturer to repair defective passenger motor vehicles.

If a new passenger motor vehicle does not conform to all applicable express warranties, and the consumer reports the nonconformity to the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer during the term of the express warranties or during the period of one year following the date of original delivery of the passenger motor vehicle to a consumer, whichever is the earlier date, the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer shall make the repairs necessary to conform the passenger motor vehicle to the express warranties, notwithstanding the fact that the repairs might be made after the expiration of the warranty or one-year period.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 3.

Collateral References.

Liability for delay in making repair of motor vehicle, 44 A.L.R.4th 1174.

Award of attorney’s fees under state motor vehicle warranty legislation (lemon laws), 82 A.L.R.5th 501.

51-07-18.
Duty to replace defective passenger motor vehicle or refund price — Prerequisite of using available informal dispute settlement process.

If the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer is unable to make the passenger motor vehicle conform to any applicable express warranty by repairing or correcting any defect or condition that substantially impairs the use and market value of the passenger motor vehicle, after a reasonable number of attempts, the manufacturer shall replace that passenger motor vehicle with a comparable passenger motor vehicle or accept return of the passenger motor vehicle from the consumer, and refund to the consumer the full purchase price, including all collateral charges, less a reasonable allowance for the consumer’s use of the vehicle not exceeding ten cents per mile [1.61 kilometers] driven or ten percent of the purchase price, whichever is less. Refunds must be made to the consumer, the lessor, and the lienholder, if any, as their interests may appear. A reasonable allowance for use is the amount directly attributable to use by the consumer before the consumer’s first report of the nonconformity to the manufacturer, agent, or dealer, and during any subsequent period when the vehicle is not out of service for repair.

It is an affirmative defense to any claim under sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22:

That an alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair the use and market value of the passenger motor vehicle; or

That a nonconformity is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modifications or alterations of the passenger motor vehicle by a consumer.

If a manufacturer has established or participates in an informal dispute settlement procedure that substantially complies with the substantive rules of the federal trade commission, 16 CFR 703, or if the manufacturer participates in a consumer and industry appeals, arbitration, or mediation appeals board whose decisions are binding on the manufacturer, the remedy under subsection 1 is not available to a consumer who has not first resorted to that procedure. If the consumer requests an oral presentation before the board or dispute settlement mechanism, the hearing must take place in the state in which the consumer resides. The attorney general shall, on application, issue a determination of whether an informal dispute resolution mechanism qualifies under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 4; 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 1995, ch. 473, § 2; 1995, ch. 474, § 1.

51-07-18.1.
Refunds for leased passenger motor vehicles.

In any case in which a refund is tendered by a manufacturer for a leased motor vehicle under section 51-07-18, the refund and rights of the motor vehicle lessor, lessee, and manufacturer are as follows:

The manufacturer shall provide to the lessee the sum of all payments previously paid to the motor vehicle lessor by the lessee less a reasonable allowance for the consumer’s use of the vehicle. Payments include all cash payments, security deposits, and trade-in allowance, if any, tendered by the lessee to the motor vehicle lessor under the lease agreement.

The manufacturer shall provide to the motor vehicle lessor the sum of the following:

The lessor’s actual purchase cost, less payments made by the lessee;

The freight cost, if applicable;

The cost for dealer or manufacturer installed accessories, if applicable; and

An amount equal to five percent of the lessor’s actual purchase cost as provided in subdivision a. The amount in this subdivision is in lieu of any early termination costs or penalties described in the lease agreement.

Upon return of the passenger motor vehicle, the consumer’s lease agreement with the lessor is terminated and no penalty for early termination may be assessed.

Any refund to be paid to the motor vehicle lessor must be made to the lessor and lienholder, if any, as their interests may appear.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 473, § 3.

51-07-19.
Presumptions.

It is presumed that a reasonable number of attempts have been undertaken to make a passenger motor vehicle conform to the applicable express warranties, if:

The same nonconformity has continued to exist, despite having been subject to repair more than three times by the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer, within the express warranty term or within one year of the date of original delivery of the passenger motor vehicle to a consumer, whichever is the earlier date.

The passenger motor vehicle is out of service for repair for a cumulative total of at least thirty business days during the warranty term or in a year, whichever is less.

The term of an express warranty, the one-year period and the thirty-day period, are extended by any period during which repair services are not available to the consumer because of war, invasion, strike, fire, flood, or other natural disaster.

The presumption does not apply against a manufacturer unless the manufacturer has received prior direct notification from or on behalf of the consumer and an opportunity to cure the alleged defect.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 5; 1995, ch. 473, § 4.

51-07-20.
Exclusive remedy.

A consumer who elects to proceed under sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22 is foreclosed from pursuing any other remedy arising out of the facts and circumstances which gave rise to the claim under sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 6.

51-07-21.
Limitation of actions.

An action brought under sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22 must be commenced within six months after the earlier of:

Expiration of the express warranty term; or

Eighteen months after the date of original delivery of the passenger motor vehicle to a consumer.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 7.

51-07-22.
Resale of returned passenger motor vehicles — Penalty.

A person may not sell or lease in this state a passenger motor vehicle that was returned to the manufacturer in accordance with sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22, unless the manufacturer provides:

The same express warranty it provided to the original purchaser, except the term of the warranty must be for at least twelve thousand miles or twelve months after the date of resale, whichever is earlier; and

The purchaser a statement on a separate document that must be signed by the manufacturer and the purchaser and must be in ten-point, capitalized type, in substantially the following form: “IMPORTANT: THIS VEHICLE WAS RETURNED TO THE MANUFACTURER BECAUSE DEFECTS COVERED BY THE MANUFACTURER’S EXPRESSED WARRANTY WERE NOT REPAIRED WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME AS PROVIDED BY NORTH DAKOTA LAW”.

A person may not ship or deliver for resale or lease in another state a passenger motor vehicle returned to the manufacturer in accordance with sections 51-07-16 through 51-07-22 unless full disclosure of the reasons for return is made to any prospective buyer.

Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 8; 1989, ch. 591, § 2; 1991, ch. 522, § 1; 1995, ch. 473, § 5.

51-07-23.
Unsolicited telefacsimile advertising.

It is unlawful for any person to initiate the unsolicited transmission of a telefacsimile message promoting a good or service for purchase by the recipient of the message. The term “telefacsimile” as used in this section means any process in which an electronic signal is transmitted by telephone line for conversion into written text. This section does not apply to a telefacsimile message sent to a recipient with whom the initiator has had a prior contractual or business relationship, nor does it apply to transmissions not exceeding two pages which are transmitted between the hours of nine p.m. and six a.m. Notwithstanding the above, it is unlawful to initiate a telefacsimile message to a recipient who has previously sent a written or telefacsimile message to the initiator clearly indicating that the recipient does not want to receive any telefacsimile from the initiator. A person who transmits an unsolicited telefacsimile message in violation of this section is liable to the recipient of that message for fifty dollars per month for each month in which the recipient receives the unsolicited message.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 523, § 1.

51-07-24.
Insurance claims for excessive charges — Penalty.

A person who sells goods or services paid for by the consumer from proceeds of an insurance policy that provides coverage for physical damage to automobiles may not:

Advertise or promise to provide a good or service as an incentive, pay or waive all or part of any applicable insurance deductible, or pay a rebate in an amount equal to all or part of any applicable insurance deductible; or

Knowingly charge an amount for the good or service that exceeds the usual and customary charge by that person for the good or service by an amount equal to or greater than all or part of the applicable insurance deductible paid by that person on behalf of an insured or remitted to an insured by that person as a rebate.

A person who is insured under an insurance policy that provides coverage for physical damage to automobiles may not knowingly submit a claim under the policy based on charges that are in violation of subsection 1 or may not knowingly allow a claim in violation of subsection 1 to be submitted, unless the person promptly notifies the insurer of the excessive charges.

A violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 416, § 1; 2001, ch. 442, § 1.

51-07-25.
Motor vehicle fuel franchise agreements.

A motor vehicle fuel franchise agreement may not require a security deposit except for the purpose of securing against loss of or damage to property. The dealer may satisfy any security deposit required by depositing cash or pledging a savings account or its equivalent in a financial institution in this state. Earnings accruing on a savings account or its equivalent are the property of the dealer and the dealer may withdraw the earnings annually from the account.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 417, § 1.

51-07-26.
Succession to ownership of an automobile, truck, or farm equipment dealership.

The owner of an automobile, truck, or farm equipment dealership may appoint by trust, will, or any other valid written instrument a successor to the owner’s dealership interest upon the owner’s death or incapacity.

Unless the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor has good cause to refuse to honor the succession, the successor may succeed to the ownership of the dealership under the existing franchise if:

Within ninety days of the owner’s death or incapacity, the successor gives written notice of the successor’s intent to succeed to ownership of the dealership; and

The successor agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise agreement with the prior owner.

Upon request, the successor shall promptly provide the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor evidence of the successorship appointment, as well as personal and financial information reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored by the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 418, § 1.

51-07-26.1.
Refusal to honor succession.

If a manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor believes that good cause exists to refuse to honor the intended succession under section 51-07-26, then the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor shall serve the named successor written notice of refusal to honor the intended succession within sixty days of its receipt of the notice of the intended succession. The notice must contain specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession.

If notice of refusal to honor the intended succession is not timely served upon the intended successor, the successor may continue the franchise subject only to termination as permitted otherwise in this chapter.

In determining whether good cause exists for the refusal to honor the intended succession, the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor has the burden of proving that the intended successor is not a person of good moral character or does not meet the franchisor’s existing and reasonable standards. Good cause for refusal to honor succession does not include the owner’s dealership being dualed with another manufacturer’s line.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 418, § 2.

51-07-27.
Restrictions on electronically printed credit card receipts — Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided under this section, a person that accepts credit cards for the transaction of business and also electronically prints receipts for these credit card transactions may not print on the receipt provided to the customer more than the last five digits of the credit card account number nor print on the receipt provided to the customer the expiration date of the credit card. This section does not apply to a credit card transaction in which the sole means of recording the customer’s credit card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit card. This section becomes operative on January 1, 2004, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for credit card transactions which is first put into use after December 31, 2003. This section becomes operative on January 1, 2007, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for credit card transactions which is first put into use before January 1, 2004. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 436, § 1; 2005, ch. 443, § 1.

51-07-28.
Recording devices on motor vehicles — Disclosure — Removal.

A manufacturer of a new motor vehicle sold or leased in this state which is equipped with a recording device commonly referred to as an event data recorder shall disclose by model year 2007 the presence, capacity, and capabilities of the event data recorder in the owner’s manual for the vehicle. A motor vehicle dealer shall include within the purchase contract in a clear and conspicuous manner information on the possibility of a recording device. As used in this section, an event data recorder means a feature that is installed by the manufacturer of the vehicle and does any of the following for the purpose of retrieving data:

Records the speed of the vehicle and the direction the motor vehicle is traveling.

Records vehicle location data.

Records steering performance.

Records brake performance, including whether brakes were applied before an accident.

Records the driver’s safety belt status.

Has the ability to transmit information concerning an accident in which the vehicle has been involved to a central communications system when an accident occurs.

Data recorded on an event data recorder may not be downloaded or otherwise retrieved by a person other than the owner of the motor vehicle at the time the data is recorded, or through consent by the owner’s agent or legal representative, except under any of the following circumstances:

The data is retrieved for the purpose of improving motor vehicle safety, including for medical research of the human body’s reaction to motor vehicle accidents, and the identity of the registered owner or driver is not disclosed in connection with that retrieved data. The disclosure of the vehicle identification number, with the last four digits deleted, for the purpose of improving vehicle safety, including for medical research of the human body’s reaction to motor vehicle accidents, does not constitute the disclosure of the identity of the registered owner or driver. A person authorized to download or otherwise retrieve data from a recording device under this subdivision may not release that data, except to share the data among the motor vehicle safety and medical research communities to advance motor vehicle safety, and only if the identity of the registered owner or driver is not disclosed.

The data is retrieved by a licensed motor vehicle dealer or by an automotive technician for the purpose of diagnosing, servicing, or repairing the motor vehicle.

By stipulation of the parties to the proceeding or by order of the court.

“Owner” means a person having all the incidents of ownership, including the legal title of a vehicle regardless of whether the person lends, rents, or creates a security interest in the vehicle; a person entitled to the possession of a vehicle as the purchaser under a security agreement; or the person entitled to possession of the vehicle as lessee pursuant to a written lease agreement, if the agreement at inception is for a period in excess of three months.

A person, including a service or data processor operating on behalf of the person, authorized to download or otherwise retrieve data from an event data recorder pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 2 may not release that data except for the purposes of motor vehicle safety and medical communities to advance motor vehicle safety, security, or traffic management; or to a data processor solely for the purposes permitted by this subsection and only if the identity of the owner or driver of the vehicle is not disclosed.

If a motor vehicle is equipped with a recording device that is capable of recording or transmitting information relating to vehicle location data or concerning an accident to a central communications system and that capability is part of a subscription service, the fact that the information may be recorded or transmitted must be disclosed in the terms and conditions of the subscription service. Subsection 2 does not apply to a subscription service that meets the requirements of this subsection.

An insurer may not require as a condition of insurability consent of the owner for access to data that may be stored within an event data recorder and may not use data retrieved with the owner’s consent before or after an accident for the purpose of rate assessment.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 440, § 1.

51-07-28.1.
Tracking devices on motor vehicles — Disclosure — Removal — Penalty.

A lender may not require a person to install or maintain a global tracking or positioning system or device on a motor vehicle for the purpose of locating or tracking the vehicle to repossess the vehicle in case of loan default, unless:

The lender includes within the financing contract, in a clear and conspicuous manner, information on the installation or placement of the system or device;

The system or device is installed at no cost to the buyer; and

The system or device is removed within sixty days of the loan for the motor vehicle being paid in full at:

The expense of the seller or lender; and

A location agreed upon by the seller or lender and buyer.

A lender that violates this section is subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars. In the case of a second or subsequent violation of this section, the lender is subject to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than two thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 381, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

51-07-29.
Warranty work compensation.

A motor vehicle manufacturer shall include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service, parts, and labor, in warranty work compensation. In addition, a motor vehicle manufacturer shall provide adequate time allowances for diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service for the work performed. The hourly labor rate paid by a motor vehicle manufacturer to the dealer for warranty services may not be less than the average rate charged by the dealer for like service to nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty service as provided under subsection 5. A motor vehicle manufacturer may not reimburse a dealer for parts used in the performance of warranty repair at a lower rate than the average retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for these parts as provided under subsection 4.

A motor vehicle manufacturer shall pay a dealer on a claim made by a dealer under this section within thirty days of the approval of the claim. The manufacturer shall either approve or disapprove a claim within thirty days after the claim is submitted to the manufacturer. The manufacturer may prescribe the manner in which and the forms on which the dealer must present the claim. A claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days after the manufacturer receives the claim must be construed to be approved and the manufacturer shall pay the claim within thirty days.

A motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch shall fully compensate its motor vehicle dealers licensed in this state for warranty parts, work, and service specified in this section. Failure to fully compensate includes a reduction in the amount due to the dealer or imposing a separate charge, surcharge, or other imposition by which the motor vehicle manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch seeks to recover the costs of complying with this section from the dealer.

The retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for parts is established by the dealer submitting to the manufacturer or distributor one hundred sequential nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts or ninety consecutive days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts, whichever is less, covering repairs made no more than one hundred eighty days before the submission and declaring the average percentage markup.

The retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for labor must be established using the same process as provided under subsection 4 and declaring the average labor rate. The average labor rate must be determined by dividing the amount of the dealer’s total labor sales by the number of total hours that generated those sales. If a labor rate and parts markup rate are simultaneously declared by the dealer, the dealer may use the same repair orders to complete each calculation as provided under subsection 4.

In calculating the retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for parts and labor, the following work may not be included in the calculation:

Repairs for manufacturer or distributor special events, specials, or promotional discounts for retail customer repairs;

Parts sold at wholesale;

Routine maintenance not covered under any retail customer warranty, including fluids, filters, and belts not provided in the course of repairs;

Nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not have an individual part number;

Tires; and

Vehicle reconditioning.

The average of the parts markup rates and labor rate is presumed to be fair and reasonable and must go into effect thirty days following the manufacturer’s approval. A manufacturer or distributor may rebut the presumption by reasonably substantiating that a rate is unreasonable in light of the practices of all other franchised motor vehicle dealers in an economically similar area of the state offering the dealer’s declaration of the same line-make vehicles, not later than thirty days after submission. If the average parts markup rate or average labor rate is rebutted, or both, the manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the average percentage markup based on that rebuttal not later than thirty days after submission.

Each manufacturer, in establishing a schedule of compensation for warranty work, shall rely on the vehicle dealer’s written schedule of hourly labor rates and parts and may not obligate any vehicle dealer to engage in unduly burdensome or time-consuming documentation of rates or parts, including obligating vehicle dealers to engage in transaction-by-transaction or part-by-part calculations.

A dealer or manufacturer may demand that the average parts markup or average labor rate be calculated using the process provided under subsections 4 and 5; however, the demand for the average parts markup may not be made within twelve months of the last parts markup declaration and the demand for the average labor rate may not be made within twelve months of the last labor rate declaration. If a parts markup or labor rate is demanded by the dealer or manufacturer, the dealer shall determine the repair orders to be included in the calculation under subsections 4 and 5.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 388, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 16, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 388, S.L. 2013.

51-07-30.
Customer contract clauses — Billing examples — Enforcement — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Customer” means a person that borrows, buys, leases, or obtains services or property under a service contract. The term does not include a government entity.

“Service contract” means a written agreement between a customer and a party acting in the usual course of business in which a customer borrows, buys, leases, or obtains personal property, real property, or services for valuable consideration.

“Terms and conditions” means general and special arrangements, provisions, requirements, rules, specifications, and standards that form an integral part of an agreement or contract.

If a service contract contains terms and conditions clauses, the service contract must be accepted by the customer for the service contract to be enforceable.

If a service contract contains a liquidated damages clause, the clause must provide specific examples of how any fees or charges will be calculated.

The attorney general may enforce this section. The attorney general, in enforcing this section, has the powers provided in chapter 51-15 and may seek the remedies in chapter 51-15. Each act in violation of this section constitutes a separate violation of chapter 51-15. The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this section are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties in chapter 51-15, or otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 424, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 51-07-30 was enacted 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the enactment made in Section 1 of Chapter 424, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1195 over Section 1 of Chapter 422, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1339.

Section 3 of chapter 424, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to contracts entered after July 31, 2019.”

51-07-31.
Parts, equipment, and accessory dealers reimbursed for warranty repair.

As used in this section:

“Commercial distributor” means any person that offers for sale, sells, or distributes to a dealer parts for any new commercial motor vehicle, truck, or semitrailer, or vehicular implements, commercial equipment, or accessories, or attachment units, designed and used primarily for transporting commodities, merchandise, or commercial cargo.

“Commercial equipment dealer” means a person that engages in the business of:

Selling, at retail, parts for any new or used commercial motor vehicle, truck, or semitrailer, or vehicular implements, commercial equipment, or accessories, or attachment units, designed and used primarily for transporting commodities, merchandise, or commercial cargo; or

Repairing new or used commercial motor vehicle, truck, or semitrailer parts, or vehicular implements, commercial equipment or, accessories, or attachment units, designed and used primarily for transporting commodities, merchandise, or commercial cargo.

“Commercial manufacturer” means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing or assembling parts for any new commercial motor vehicle, truck, or semitrailer, or vehicular implements, commercial equipment, or accessories, or attachment units, designed and used primarily for transporting commodities, merchandise, or commercial cargo.

“Parts” includes essential and nonessential commercial motor vehicle, truck, or semitrailer components.

A commercial manufacturer shall include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service, parts, and labor, in warranty work compensation. In addition, a commercial manufacturer shall provide adequate time allowances for diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service for the work performed. The hourly labor rate paid by a commercial manufacturer to the commercial equipment dealer for warranty services may not be less than the average rate charged by the commercial equipment dealer for like service to nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty service. A commercial manufacturer may not reimburse a commercial equipment dealer for parts used in the performance of warranty repair at a lower rate than the average retail rate customarily charged by the commercial equipment dealer for these parts as provided under subsection 5.

A commercial manufacturer shall pay a commercial equipment dealer on a claim made by a commercial equipment dealer under this section within thirty days of the approval of the claim. The commercial manufacturer either shall approve or disapprove a claim within thirty days after the claim is submitted to the commercial manufacturer. The commercial manufacturer may prescribe the manner in which and the forms on which the commercial equipment dealer must present the claim. A claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days after the commercial manufacturer receives the claim must be construed to be approved and the manufacturer shall pay the claim within thirty days.

A commercial manufacturer, commercial distributor, or commercial distributor branch shall compensate fully its commercial equipment dealers licensed in this state for warranty parts, work, and service specified in this section. Failure to fully compensate includes a reduction in the amount due to the commercial equipment dealer or imposing a separate charge, surcharge, or other imposition by which the commercial manufacturer seeks to recover the costs of complying with this section from the commercial equipment dealer.

The retail rate customarily charged by the commercial equipment dealer for parts is established by the commercial equipment dealer submitting to the commercial manufacturer or commercial distributor one hundred sequential nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts or ninety consecutive days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts, whichever is less, covering repairs made no more than one hundred eighty days before the submission and declaring the average percentage markup.

The retail rate customarily charged by the commercial equipment dealer for labor must be established using the same process as provided under subsection 5 and declaring the average labor rate. The average labor rate must be determined by dividing the amount of the dealer’s total labor sales by the number of total hours that generated those sales. If a labor rate and parts markup rate are simultaneously declared by the commercial equipment dealer, the commercial equipment dealer may use the same repair orders to complete each calculation as provided under subsection 5.

In calculating the retail rate customarily charged by the commercial equipment dealer for parts and labor, the following work may not be included in the calculation:

Repairs for commercial manufacturer or commercial distributor special events, specials, or promotional discounts for retail customer repairs;

Parts sold at wholesale; and

Nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not have an individual part number.

The average of the parts markup rates and labor rate is presumed to be fair and reasonable and must become effective thirty days following the commercial manufacturer’s approval. Not later than thirty days after submission, a commercial manufacturer or commercial distributor may rebut the presumption by reasonably substantiating that a rate is unreasonable in light of the practices of all other commercial equipment dealers in an economically similar area of the state offering the commercial equipment dealer’s declaration of the same part, or vehicular implement, equipment, accessory, or attachment unit. If the average parts markup rate or average labor rate, or both are rebutted, the commercial manufacturer or commercial distributor shall propose an adjustment of the average percentage markup based on that rebuttal not later than thirty days after submission.

Each commercial manufacturer, in establishing a schedule of compensation for warranty work, shall rely on the commercial equipment dealer’s written schedule of hourly labor rates and parts and may not obligate any commercial equipment dealer to engage in unduly burdensome or time-consuming documentation of rates or parts, including obligating commercial equipment dealers to engage in transaction-by-transaction or part-by-part calculations.

A commercial dealer or commercial manufacturer may demand the average parts markup or average labor rate be calculated using the process provided under subsections 5 and 6; however, the demand for the average parts markup may not be made within twelve months of the last parts markup declaration and the demand for the average labor rate may not be made within twelve months of the last labor rate declaration. If a parts markup or labor rate is demanded by the commercial equipment dealer or commercial manufacturer, the commercial equipment dealer shall determine the repair orders to be included in the calculation under subsections 5 and 6.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 422, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 51-07-30 was enacted 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the enactment made in Section 1 of Chapter 424, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1195 over Section 1 of Chapter 422, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1339. Section 51-07-30 as added by Section 1 of Chapter 422 is accordingly redesignated to the present location.